src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON PRON-PERIF-MOD_СЬКАМОНЗА !!= * @CODE@ ськамонза:ськам
+Exclusive+PerifMod:%{АО%} OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-VOWEL ;
+Exclusive+PerifMod:%{АО%} OBLIQUECX-PX-REQUIRES-NO-VOWEL ;

!! ### REFLEXIVE PRONOUNS
!! ### NON-STRESSED REFLEXIVE DATIVES


!LEXICON PRON-REL_AVA
!+Rel: NMN-SG ;
!+Rel: NMN-PL ;
!+Rel: NMN-SG/PL ;

!LEXICON PRON-ABL-PXSG1
!+Abl+PxSg1: K_ГА ;
!LEXICON PRON-ABL-PXSG2
!+Abl+PxSg2: K_ГА ;
!LEXICON PRON-ABL-PXSG3
!+Abl+PxSg3: K_вок ;
!LEXICON PRON-ABL-PXPL1
!+Abl+PxPl1: K_овок ;
!LEXICON PRON-ABL-PXPL2
!+Abl+PxPl2: K_овок ;
!LEXICON PRON-ABL-PXPL3
!+Abl+PxPl3: K_ГА ;



!LEXICON PRON-INE-PXSG1
!+Ine+PxSg1: K_ГА ;
!LEXICON PRON-INE-PXSG2
!+Ine+PxSg2: K_ГА ;
!LEXICON PRON-INE-PXSG3
!+Ine+PxSg3: K_вок ;
!LEXICON PRON-INE-PXPL1
!+Ine+PxPl1: K_овок ;
!LEXICON PRON-INE-PXPL2
!+Ine+PxPl2: K_овок ;
!LEXICON PRON-INE-PXPL3
!+Ine+PxPl3: K_ГА ;

!LEXICON PRON-PRL-PXSG1
!+Prl+PxSg1: K_ГА ;
!LEXICON PRON-PRL-PXSG2
!+Prl+PxSg2: K_ГА ;
!LEXICON PRON-PRL-PXSG3
!+Prl+PxSg3: K_вок ;
!LEXICON PRON-PRL-PXPL1
!+Prl+PxPl1: K_овок ;
!LEXICON PRON-PRL-PXPL2
!+Prl+PxPl2: K_овок ;
!LEXICON PRON-PRL-PXPL3
!+Prl+PxPl3: K_ГА ;

!LEXICON PRON-X-PXSG1
!+PxSg1: K_ГА ;
!LEXICON PRON-X-PXSG2
!+PxSg2: K_ГА ;
!LEXICON PRON-X-PXSG3
!+PxSg3: K_вок ;
!LEXICON PRON-X-PXPL1
!+PxPl1: K_овок ;
!LEXICON PRON-X-PXPL2
!+PxPl2: K_овок ;
!LEXICON PRON-X-PXPL3
!+PxPl3: K_ГА ;

LEXICON INDEF-ENDS-HERE
@U.INDEF.BDI@:@U.INDEF.BDI@%-бъди ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.KATI@ ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.KELJK@:@U.INDEF.KELJK@%-кельк ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.KOI@ ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.TAGA@ ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.TA@ ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.POVSJ@:@U.INDEF.POVSJ@%-повсь ENDLEX ;
@U.INDEF.ZERO@ ENDLEX ;

LEXICON FINAL-PRONOUNS
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABL@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ABL@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезьда ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CAU@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.CAU@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезенкса ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.COM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.COM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезнек ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезенди ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезень ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ELA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ELA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезьста ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ILL@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.ILL@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезьс ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.INE@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.INE@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезьса ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.PRL@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезьге ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.TRA@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезькс ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@месть ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@месне ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@меснень ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@месненди ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.INDEF@мезе ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@мезсь ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@мезть ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.DEF@мезти ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезненди ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезезти ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезезенди ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезнень ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезезень ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезне ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG1@мезезе ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@месненди ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезценди ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезцти ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@меснень ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезцень ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@месне ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG2@мезце ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезензонды ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезенцты ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезензон ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезенц ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.PL@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезенз%{АО%} ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXSG3@мезец ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@мезенконди ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@мезенконь ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL1@мезенк ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@мезентенди ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@мезентень ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL2@мезенте ENDLEX ;

@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.DAT@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@мезьснонды ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.GEN@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@мезьснон ENDLEX ;
@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@мезе+AssocColl:@U.DECL-NX.SP@@U.CX.NOM@@U.DECL-DX.PXPL3@мезьсн%{АО%} ENDLEX ;

@U.CX.ELA@коста+AssocColl:@U.CX.ELA@коста ENDLEX ;
@U.CX.ILL@коза+AssocColl:@U.CX.ILL@коза ENDLEX ;
@U.CX.INE@коса+AssocColl:@U.CX.INE@коса ENDLEX ;
@U.CX.PRL@кува+AssocColl:@U.CX.PRL@кува ENDLEX ;
@U.CX.PRL@куване+AssocColl:@U.CX.PRL@куване ENDLEX ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

LEXICON PRONOUN-TYPES
ськамонза+Pron:ськам PRON-PERIF-MOD_СЬКАМОНЗА  "hän yksin" ;
